Illinois, session 104th, SB683.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 14-131 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/14-131)7    Sec. 14-131. Contributions by State. 8    (a) The The State shall make contributions to the System 9by appropriations of amounts which, together with other 10employer contributions from trust, federal, and other funds, 11employee contributions, investment income, and other income, 12will be sufficient to meet the cost of maintaining and 13administering the System on a 90% funded basis in accordance 14with actuarial recommendations.15    For the purposes of this Section and Section 14-135.08, 16references to State contributions refer only to employer 17contributions and do not include employee contributions that 18are picked up or otherwise paid by the State or a department on 19behalf of the employee.20    (b) The Board shall determine the total amount of State 21contributions required for each fiscal year on the basis of 22the actuarial tables and other assumptions adopted by the 23Board, using the formula in subsection (e).  SB0683- 2 -LRB104 06991 RPS 17028 b1    The Board shall also determine a State contribution rate 2for each fiscal year, expressed as a percentage of payroll, 3based on the total required State contribution for that fiscal 4year (less the amount received by the System from 5appropriations under Section 8.12 of the State Finance Act and 6Section 1 of the State Pension Funds Continuing Appropriation 7Act, if any, for the fiscal year ending on the June 30 8immediately preceding the applicable November 15 certification 9deadline), the estimated payroll (including all forms of 10compensation) for personal services rendered by eligible 11employees, and the recommendations of the actuary.12    For the purposes of this Section and Section 14.1 of the 13State Finance Act, the term "eligible employees" includes 14employees who participate in the System, persons who may elect 15to participate in the System but have not so elected, persons 16who are serving a qualifying period that is required for 17participation, and annuitants employed by a department as 18described in subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(2) of Section 14-111.19    (c) Contributions shall be made by the several departments 20for each pay period by warrants drawn by the State Comptroller 21against their respective funds or appropriations based upon 22vouchers stating the amount to be so contributed. These 23amounts shall be based on the full rate certified by the Board 24under Section 14-135.08 for that fiscal year. From March 5, 252004 (the effective date of Public Act 93-665) through the 26payment of the final payroll from fiscal year 2004   SB0683- 3 -LRB104 06991 RPS 17028 b1appropriations, the several departments shall not make 2contributions for the remainder of fiscal year 2004 but shall 3instead make payments as required under subsection (a-1) of 4Section 14.1 of the State Finance Act. The several departments 5shall resume those contributions at the commencement of fiscal 6year 2005.7    (c-1) Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this Section, for 8fiscal years 2010, 2012, and each fiscal year thereafter, 9contributions by the several departments are not required to 10be made for General Revenue Funds payrolls processed by the 11Comptroller. Payrolls paid by the several departments from all 12other State funds must continue to be processed pursuant to 13subsection (c) of this Section.14    (c-2) Unless otherwise directed by the Comptroller under 15subsection (c-3), the Board shall submit vouchers for payment 16of State contributions to the System for the applicable month 17on the 15th day of each month, or as soon thereafter as may be 18practicable. The amount vouchered for a monthly payment shall 19total one-twelfth of the fiscal year General Revenue Fund 20contribution as certified by the System pursuant to Section 2114-135.08 of this Code. 22    (c-3) Beginning in State fiscal year 2025, if the 23Comptroller requests that the Board submit, during a State 24fiscal year, vouchers for multiple monthly payments for 25advance payment of State contributions due to the System for 26that State fiscal year, then the Board shall submit those   SB0683- 4 -LRB104 06991 RPS 17028 b1additional vouchers as directed by the Comptroller, 2notwithstanding subsection (c-2). Unless an act of 3appropriations provides otherwise, nothing in this Section 4authorizes the Board to submit, in a State fiscal year, 5vouchers for the payment of State contributions to the System 6in an amount that exceeds the rate of payroll that is certified 7by the System under Section 14-135.08 for that State fiscal 8year. 9    (d) If an employee is paid from trust funds or federal 10funds, the department or other employer shall pay employer 11contributions from those funds to the System at the certified 12rate, unless the terms of the trust or the federal-State 13agreement preclude the use of the funds for that purpose, in 14which case the required employer contributions shall be paid 15by the State. 16    (e) For State fiscal years 2012 through 2045, the minimum 17contribution to the System to be made by the State for each 18fiscal year shall be an amount determined by the System to be 19sufficient to bring the total assets of the System up to 90% of 20the total actuarial liabilities of the System by the end of 21State fiscal year 2045. In making these determinations, the 22required State contribution shall be calculated each year as a 23level percentage of payroll over the years remaining to and 24including fiscal year 2045 and shall be determined under the 25projected unit credit actuarial cost method.26    A change in an actuarial or investment assumption that   SB0683- 5 -LRB104 06991 RPS 17028 b1increases or decreases the required State contribution and 2first applies in State fiscal year 2018 or thereafter shall be 3implemented in equal annual amounts over a 5-year period 4beginning in the State fiscal year in which the actuarial 5change first applies to the required State contribution.6    A change in an actuarial or investment assumption that 7increases or decreases the required State contribution and 8first applied to the State contribution in fiscal year 2014, 92015, 2016, or 2017 shall be implemented:10        (i) as already applied in State fiscal years before 11    2018; and12        (ii) in the portion of the 5-year period beginning in 13    the State fiscal year in which the actuarial change first 14    applied that occurs in State fiscal year 2018 or 15    thereafter, by calculating the change in equal annual 16    amounts over that 5-year period and then implementing it 17    at the resulting annual rate in each of the remaining 18    fiscal years in that 5-year period.19    For State fiscal years 1996 through 2005, the State 20contribution to the System, as a percentage of the applicable 21employee payroll, shall be increased in equal annual 22increments so that by State fiscal year 2011, the State is 23contributing at the rate required under this Section; except 24that (i) for State fiscal year 1998, for all purposes of this 25Code and any other law of this State, the certified percentage 26of the applicable employee payroll shall be 5.052% for   SB0683- 6 -LRB104 06991 RPS 17028 b1employees earning eligible creditable service under Section 214-110 and 6.500% for all other employees, notwithstanding any 3contrary certification made under Section 14-135.08 before 4July 7, 1997 (the effective date of Public Act 90-65), and (ii) 5in the following specified State fiscal years, the State 6contribution to the System shall not be less than the 7following indicated percentages of the applicable employee 8payroll, even if the indicated percentage will produce a State 9contribution in excess of the amount otherwise required under 10this subsection and subsection (a): 9.8% in FY 1999; 10.0% in 11FY 2000; 10.2% in FY 2001; 10.4% in FY 2002; 10.6% in FY 2003; 12and 10.8% in FY 2004.13    Beginning in State fiscal year 2046, the minimum State 14contribution for each fiscal year shall be the amount needed 15to maintain the total assets of the System at 90% of the total 16actuarial liabilities of the System.17    Amounts received by the System pursuant to Section 25 of 18the Budget Stabilization Act or Section 8.12 of the State 19Finance Act in any fiscal year do not reduce and do not 20constitute payment of any portion of the minimum State 21contribution required under this Article in that fiscal year. 22Such amounts shall not reduce, and shall not be included in the 23calculation of, the required State contributions under this 24Article in any future year until the System has reached a 25funding ratio of at least 90%. A reference in this Article to 26the "required State contribution" or any substantially similar   SB0683- 7 -LRB104 06991 RPS 17028 b1term does not include or apply to any amounts payable to the 2System under Section 25 of the Budget Stabilization Act. 3    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, the 4required State contribution for State fiscal year 2005 and for 5fiscal year 2008 and each fiscal year thereafter, as 6calculated under this Section and certified under Section 714-135.08, shall not exceed an amount equal to (i) the amount 8of the required State contribution that would have been 9calculated under this Section for that fiscal year if the 10System had not received any payments under subsection (d) of 11Section 7.2 of the General Obligation Bond Act, minus (ii) the 12portion of the State's total debt service payments for that 13fiscal year on the bonds issued in fiscal year 2003 for the 14purposes of that Section 7.2, as determined and certified by 15the Comptroller, that is the same as the System's portion of 16the total moneys distributed under subsection (d) of Section 177.2 of the General Obligation Bond Act.18    (f) (Blank).19    (g) For purposes of determining the required State 20contribution to the System, the value of the System's assets 21shall be equal to the actuarial value of the System's assets, 22which shall be calculated as follows:23    As of June 30, 2008, the actuarial value of the System's 24assets shall be equal to the market value of the assets as of 25that date. In determining the actuarial value of the System's 26assets for fiscal years after June 30, 2008, any actuarial   SB0683- 8 -LRB104 06991 RPS 17028 b1gains or losses from investment return incurred in a fiscal 2year shall be recognized in equal annual amounts over the 35-year period following that fiscal year. 4    (h) For purposes of determining the required State 5contribution to the System for a particular year, the 6actuarial value of assets shall be assumed to earn a rate of 7return equal to the System's actuarially assumed rate of 8return. 9    (i) (Blank).10    (j) (Blank).11    (k) For fiscal year 2012 and each fiscal year thereafter, 12after the submission of all payments for eligible employees 13from personal services line items paid from the General 14Revenue Fund in the fiscal year have been made, the 15Comptroller shall provide to the System a certification of the 16sum of all expenditures in the fiscal year for personal 17services. Upon receipt of the certification, the System shall 18determine the amount due to the System based on the full rate 19certified by the Board under Section 14-135.08 for the fiscal 20year in order to meet the State's obligation under this 21Section. The System shall compare this amount due to the 22amount received by the System for the fiscal year. If the 23amount due is more than the amount received, the difference 24shall be termed the "Prior Fiscal Year Shortfall" for purposes 25of this Section, and the Prior Fiscal Year Shortfall shall be 26satisfied under Section 1.2 of the State Pension Funds   SB0683- 9 -LRB104 06991 RPS 17028 b1Continuing Appropriation Act. If the amount due is less than 2the amount received, the difference shall be termed the "Prior 3Fiscal Year Overpayment" for purposes of this Section, and the 4Prior Fiscal Year Overpayment shall be repaid by the System to 5the General Revenue Fund as soon as practicable after the 6certification. 7(Source: P.A. 103-588, eff. 6-5-24.)